src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
! ========================================================================== !
!!                           !!!Plains Cree noun morphology                           
! ========================================================================== !


!! !!!Prefixes


LEXICON NounPrefixes

!! @LEXNAME@ redirects to AN-IN, BODY, INALIENABLE
! and EXPER

AN-IN       ; ! Animate and inanimate nouns
DEP-M-INIT  ; ! Dependent nouns, generic form with m-
DEP-KINTERMS ; ! Dependent nouns. The generic form is in the stem lexicon on its own.

LEXICON AN-IN
!! @LEXNAME@ adds the prefixes ni-, ki-, o-. Redirects to STEMS

           @U.noun.abs@            STEMS ; 
< 0:n 0:i "@U.noun.1sg@"  0:"t2" > STEMS ; ! 1
< 0:k 0:i "@U.noun.2sg@"  0:"t2" > STEMS ; ! 2
< 0:o     "@U.noun.3sg@"  0:"t2" > STEMS ; ! 3
< 0:o     "@U.noun.4sg@" 0:"t2" > STEMS ; ! 3-singular-obviative
< 0:n 0:i "@U.noun.1pl@"  0:"t2" > STEMS ; ! exclusive Pl
< 0:k 0:i "@U.noun.12pl@" 0:"t2" > STEMS ; ! inclusive Pl
< 0:k 0:i "@U.noun.2pl@"  0:"t2" > STEMS ; ! 2pl 
< 0:o     "@U.noun.3pl@"  0:"t2" > STEMS ; ! 3pl
< 0:o     "@U.noun.4pl@" 0:"t2" > STEMS ; ! 3-plural-obviate


LEXICON DEP-M-INIT
!! @LEXNAME@  adds the prefixes n-, k-, o- (which alternate to w- in twolc), and generic form m- . Redirects to DEP-M-INIT.
< 0:m "@U.noun.abs@"  > DEP-M-INIT-STEMS ; !
< 0:n "@U.noun.1sg@"  > DEP-M-INIT-STEMS ; !
< 0:k "@U.noun.2sg@"  > DEP-M-INIT-STEMS ; !
< 0:o "@U.noun.3sg@"  > DEP-M-INIT-STEMS ; !
< 0:o "@U.noun.4sg@" > DEP-M-INIT-STEMS ; !
< 0:n "@U.noun.1pl@"  > DEP-M-INIT-STEMS ; !
< 0:k "@U.noun.12pl@" > DEP-M-INIT-STEMS ; !
< 0:k "@U.noun.2pl@"  > DEP-M-INIT-STEMS ; !
< 0:o "@U.noun.3pl@"  > DEP-M-INIT-STEMS ; !
< 0:o "@U.noun.4pl@" > DEP-M-INIT-STEMS ; !



LEXICON DEP-KINTERMS
!! @LEXNAME@  adds the prefixes n-, k-, o- (which alternate to w- in twolc) Redirects to DEP-KINTERMSSTEMS
< 0:n "@U.noun.1sg@"  > DEP-KINTERMSSTEMS ; ! 1
< 0:k "@U.noun.2sg@"  > DEP-KINTERMSSTEMS ; ! 2
< 0:o "@U.noun.3sg@"  > DEP-KINTERMSSTEMS ; ! 3
< 0:o "@U.noun.4sg@" > DEP-KINTERMSSTEMS ; ! 3indef
< 0:n "@U.noun.1pl@"  > DEP-KINTERMSSTEMS ; ! exclusive Pl
< 0:k "@U.noun.12pl@" > DEP-KINTERMSSTEMS ; ! inclusive Pl
< 0:k "@U.noun.2pl@"  > DEP-KINTERMSSTEMS ; ! 2pl 
< 0:o "@U.noun.3pl@"  > DEP-KINTERMSSTEMS ; ! 3pl 
< 0:o "@U.noun.4pl@" > DEP-KINTERMSSTEMS ; ! 



!! Now, lexc directs us to the ../stems/nouns.lexc file,
!! where we find all the nominal stems. The suffixes are then
!! found at the end of this file.

! ===============================================================
! ===============================================================
! ===============================================================
! ===============================================================
! ===============================================================



!! !!!Suffixes


!! !!The declensions for Animates 



LEXICON AN_DECL_0POSS !!= * @CODE@ for the animate declension, Dim: -isis and -is 
ANABSDECL ;
+N+AN+Sg:%> ANSUFF_0POSS ;
+N+AN+Pl:%> ANSUFF_Pl_0POSS ;
!+N+AN:%> ANSUFF_LOC ;
+N+AN+Der/Dim:%>is%^DIM%> AN_DIM ;
+N+AN+Der/Dim:%>is%^DIMis%> AN_DIM ;

LEXICON AN_DECL_PL !!= * @CODE@ for the animate declension, Dim: -isis and -is 
ANABSDECL_PL ;
+N+AN+Pl:%> ANSUFF_PL ;
!+N+AN:%> ANSUFF_LOC ;
+N+AN+Der/Dim:%>is%^DIM%> AN_DIM ;
+N+AN+Der/Dim:%>is%^DIMis%> AN_DIM ;

LEXICON AN_DECLis !!= * @CODE@ for the animate declension, Dim: -is diminutives
ANABSDECL ;
+N+AN+Sg:%> ANSUFF_SG ;
+N+AN+Pl:%> ANSUFF_PL ;
!+N+AN:%> ANSUFF_LOC ;
+N+AN+Der/Dim:%>is%^DIM%> AN_DIM ;

! The following does not seem to work, even though it is a carbon copy of AN_DECLis and IN_DECLisis

LEXICON AN_DECLisis !!= * @CODE@ for the animate declension, Dim: -isis diminutives
 

! +N+AN+Der/Dim:%>is%^DIMis%> ANimDECLisis ;

ANimDECLisis ;

LEXICON AN_DECL !!= * @CODE@ for the animate declension, poss.-im-, Dim: -is
                                     ANABSDECL  ;
             +N+AN+Sg:%>im          ANSUFF_SG  ;
             +N+AN+Pl:%>im          ANSUFF_PL  ;
        +N+AN+Der/Dim:%>is%^DIM%>    ANABSDECL  ; !
        +N+AN+Der/Dim:%>is%^DIMis%>    ANABSDECL  ; !ihkosis
+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg:%>im%^DIMis%> ANSUFF_SG  ; !
+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl:%>im%^DIMis%> ANSUFF_PL  ; !
+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg:%>im%^DIMisis%> ANSUFF_SG  ; !
+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl:%>im%^DIMisis%> ANSUFF_PL  ; !
LEXICON ANimDECLisis !!= * @CODE@ for the animate declension, poss.-im-, Dim: -isis
                                     ANABSDECL  ;
             +N+AN+Sg:%>im          ANSUFF_SG  ;
             +N+AN+Pl:%>im          ANSUFF_PL  ;
        +N+AN+Der/Dim:%>is%^DIMis%>    ANABSDECL  ; !ihkosis
+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg:%>im%^DIMisis%> ANSUFF_SG  ; !
+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl:%>im%^DIMisis%> ANSUFF_PL  ; !

LEXICON ANimDECLis !!= * @CODE@ for the animate declension, poss.-im-, Dim: -is
                                     ANABSDECL  ;
             +N+AN+Sg:%>im          ANSUFF_SG  ;
             +N+AN+Pl:%>im          ANSUFF_PL  ;
!                +N+AN:%>im          ANSUFF_LOC ;
        +N+AN+Der/Dim:%>is%^DIM%>    ANABSDECL  ; !ihkosis
!   +N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN:%>im%^DIMis%> ANSUFF_LOC ; !
+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg:%>im%^DIMis%> ANSUFF_SG  ; !
+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl:%>im%^DIMis%> ANSUFF_PL  ; !


LEXICON ANimDECLw !!= * @CODE@ for the animate declension, stem -w, poss.-im-, Dim: -is
< "+N":a "+AN":0 "+Sg":0 "@U.noun.abs@" > SG_  ; ! -a
< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Sg":0 "@U.noun.abs@" > OBVIATIVE  ; !
< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Pl":0 "@U.noun.abs@" > PLak  ; !
< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "@U.noun.abs@" > LOC  ;
             +N+AN+Sg:%>im          ANSUFF_SG  ;
             +N+AN+Pl:%>im          ANSUFF_PL  ;
!                +N+AN:%>im          ANSUFF_LOC ;
!        +N+AN+Der/Dim:%>is%^DIM%>    ANABSDECL  ; !
        +N+AN+Der/Dim:%>is%^DIMis%>    ANABSDECL  ; !ihkosis
!   +N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN:%>im%^DIMis%> ANSUFF_LOC ; !
+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg:%>im%^DIMis%> ANSUFF_SG  ; !
+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl:%>im%^DIMis%> ANSUFF_PL  ; !


LEXICON AN_DIM !!= * @CODE@ both for lexicalised and derivated diminutives
!   +N+AN: ANSUFF_LOC ;
          ANABSDECL  ;
+N+AN+Sg: ANSUFF_SG  ;
+N+AN+Pl: ANSUFF_PL  ;


LEXICON ANimDECLnaahk !!= * @CODE@ for the animate declension, poss.-im-, Dim: -is, , with collectiv loc
                                     ANABSDECLnaahk  ;
             +N+AN+Sg:%>im          ANSUFF_SG  ;
             +N+AN+Pl:%>im          ANSUFF_PL  ;
        +N+AN+Der/Dim:%>is%^DIM%>    ANABSDECL  ; !ihkosis
        +N+AN+Der/Dim:%>is%^DIMis%>    ANABSDECL  ; !
+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg:%>im%^DIMis%> ANSUFF_SG  ; !
+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl:%>im%^DIMis%> ANSUFF_PL  ; !

LEXICON ANABSDECLnaahk !!= * @CODE@ for the animate absolute declension, with collectiv loc
< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Sg":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  SG_ ; !
< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Pl":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  PLak ; !
< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Sg":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  OBVIATIVE ;!
< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  LOCinaahk       ;


LEXICON ANimDECLnaahk-NOPOSS !!= * @CODE@ for the animate declension, poss.-im-, Dim: -is, , with collectiv loc
                                     ANABSDECLnaahk  ;
        +N+AN+Der/Dim:%>is%^DIMis%>    ANABSDECL  ; !


LEXICON ANABSDECL !!= * @CODE@ for the animate absolute declension
< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Sg":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  SG_ ; !
< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Pl":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  PLak ; !
< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Sg":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  OBVIATIVE ;!
< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  LOC       ; !

LEXICON ANABSDECL_PL !!= * @CODE@ for the animate absolute declension
< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Pl":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  PLak ; !
< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  LOC       ; !


LEXICON AN_GENERIC
< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Sg":0 "@U.noun.abs@" > SG_       ; !
< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Pl":0 "@U.noun.abs@" > PLak      ; !
< "+N":0 "+AN":0 "+Sg":0 "@U.noun.abs@" >  OBVIATIVE ;!
