src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON STEMLIST
apisciyinîs AN_DIM "dwarf; short person" ;
asâm AN_DECL_0POSS "snowshoe" ;
asikan AN_DECL_0POSS "sock, stocking" ; ! singular possessive form usually does not, but can take /-im/; diminutive: asikanis
askihtakwasikan AN_DECL_0POSS "green sock" ;
astis AN_DECL_0POSS "mitt, mitten; glove" ; ! singular dim: ascisis
atâmipêkîw-môswa:atâmipêkîw-môsw ANimDECLw "water moose" ;
atoskêwitâs AN_DECL_0POSS "overalls; work pants" ;
atoskêyâkaniskwêw ANimDECLnaahk "female servant" ; ! singular [ý] as alternant for /h/; **hý
atôspiy AN_DECL "older tree; orange-coloured willow" ;
ayamihêwiskwêw ANimDECLnaahk "nun" ;
ayapîhkêsîs AN_DIM "small spider" ;
âpihtawikosisâniskwêw ANimDECLnaahk "Métis woman, halfbreed woman" ;
cahcahkâyow AN_DECLisis "blackbird" ;
cihcicâpânâskos AN_DIM "buggy, cart; small wagon" ;
cistêmâw AN_DECL "tobacco" ; ! singular cf. kistêýimâw s/he is respected
ihkwa:ihkw ANimDECLw "louse (insect)" ;
iskwês AN_DIM "teenage girl, little girl" ;
kayâs-asâm AN_DECL_0POSS "old snowshoe" ;
kayâs-astis AN_DECL_0POSS "old glove, old mitt" ;
kâhkâkiw AN_DECL "raven" ; ! singular /kâhkâk-/ caw-caw; onomatopoeic
kâkwa:kâkw ANimDECLw "porcupine" ;
kâsakês AN_DIM "glutton; cat" ;
kêhtê-iskwêw ANimDECLnaahk "old woman" ;
kihci-niska AN_DECLisis "Canada goose" ;
kitimâkâpêw AN_DECL "poor man" ;
kîskîskwêhkâniskwêw ANimDECLnaahk "silly woman" ; ! singular, reduplicated 
kîwâci-iskwêw ANimDECLnaahk "bereaved woman, woman without relatives" ;
kohkôsis AN_DIM "piglet" ;
manitowikosisân AN_DECL "Son of God" ;
masinahikanâhtik:masinahikanâhtikw AN_DECL_0POSS "pencil, pen" ; ! singular also NI-3
maskihkîwiskwêw ANimDECLnaahk "nurse" ;
maskwa:maskw ANimDECLw "bear, black bear" ;
mâkwa:mâkw ANimDECLw "loon" ;
mâsamêkos AN_DIM "speckled trout" ;
mihyawêstis AN_DECL_0POSS "fur glove or mitten" ;
misihêw AN_DECL "turkey; chicken; eagle, hawk" ;
mistahi-maskwa:mistahi-maskw ANimDECLw "Big Bear; prominent Cree chief, signatory to an adhesion to Treaty 6; wrongfully persecuted and imprisoned in the backlash to the Riel Resistance" ; 
mistanikwacâs ANimDECLnaahk "gopher" ;
miyoskaminowi-pîsimwak:miyoskaminowi-pîsimw AN_DECL_PL "spring months; March, April, and May" ; ! plural 
mîkisis AN_DIM "bead" ;
môswa:môsw ANimDECLw "moose" ;
mwâkwa:mwâkw ANimDECLw "loon" ;
nahâhkaniskwêw ANimDECLnaahk "daughter-in-law" ;
namahcîwiyiniw AN_DECL "lefthander" ;
nâpê-minôs AN_DIM "tomcat" ;
nâpêw ANimDECLnaahk "man, male adult, male being; husband" ;
nâpêwasikan AN_DECL_0POSS "man's sock" ;
nôsê-minôs AN_DECL "female cat" ;
ocêskanihkês AN_DIM "a water plant with edible root" ;
okanawêwitipiskwêw ANimDECLnaahk "night watchman" ;
okipahowêw AN_DECL "jailer, prison guard; goalie, goalkeeper, goaltender" ;
omôsâhkinikêw AN_DECL "collector" ;
osâwi-mîkis AN_DECL "yellow bead" ;
osâwitâs AN_DECL_0POSS "a yellow or orange pair of pants" ;
osîmimâs AN_DIM "youngest sibling" ;
oskasikan AN_DECL_0POSS "new sock" ;
oskastis AN_DECL_0POSS "new glove, new mitt" ;
oskinîkiskwêw ANimDECLnaahk "young woman; maiden; virgin" ;
owiyasiwêw AN_DECL "judge; lawyer" ;
ôhow ANimDECLnaahk-NOPOSS "owl" ;
pihêsis AN_DIM "little prairie-chicken" ;
pîskwa:pîskw ANimDECLw "mosquito-hawk; night-hawk" ; ! singular some dialects of sC and eastward have sg: pîsk; the name is onomatopoeic, the bird's call sounding as pîsk, pîsk
pîwêsikan AN_DECL_0POSS "sock" ;
sâkwês AN_DECL "mink" ;
sênipânis AN_DIM "narrow ribbon, piece of silk" ;
sihkihp ANimDECLnaahk "water hen, hell-diver, diver duck, coot" ;
taswêkanikwacâs ANimDECLnaahk "flying squirrel" ;
wâhkwa:wâhkw ANimDECLw "lump of roe" ;
wâpi-maskwa:wâpi-maskw ANimDECLw "White Bear; personal name of Cree chief, signatory to Treaty 4" ; ! singular SK reserve name
wâpipak:wâpipakw AN_DECL "plug tobacco" ;
wâpiscânis AN_DIM "marten" ;
wiyihkwak:wiyihkw AN_DECL_PL "glands" ; ! plural plural generally; also NDA-3; cf. wiýihkwa his/her gland(s)
yiyîkastis AN_DECL_0POSS "glove" ;
okosisimâw AN_GENERIC ;
onîkihikomâw AN_GENERIC ;
omosômimâw AN_GENERIC ;
ôhkomimâw AN_GENERIC ;
osîmisimâw AN_GENERIC ;
otôtemimâw AN_GENERIC ;
okâwîmâw AN_GENERIC ;
ohtâwîmâw AN_GENERIC ;
omisimâw AN_GENERIC ;
osisimâw AN_GENERIC ;
ohcâwîsimâw AN_GENERIC ;
ostêsimâw AN_GENERIC ;
onâpêmimâw AN_GENERIC ;
ohpan AN_GENERIC ;
